src/pronoun-sma-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Pronoun
! =======


!Pointing to all the subgrops, presented in this order below.
LEXICON Pronoun

Reciprocal ;
Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Interrogative ;
Indefinite ;
Reflexive ;

! The Reciprocal pronoun

LEXICON Reciprocal
sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc:sinsitniem FINAL1 ;
sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:sinsitnem FINAL1 ;
sinsitnien+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen:sinsitnien FINAL1 ;
sinsætnan+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill:sinsætnan FINAL1 ;
sinsitneste+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela:sinsitneste FINAL1 ;
sinsitnine+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Com:sinsitnine FINAL1 ;
sinsitnide+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Acc:sinsitnide FINAL1 ;


! Personal pronouns
! -----------------

! Personal pronouns, splitting in 1st, 2nd, 3rd
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON Personal
! New lemma form, now number as baseform, due to Oahpa
manne+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen:mov # ; ! Added to fill the gap, remove this or previous
manne+Pron+Pers+Sg1:m firstperspronsg ;
månnoeh+Pron+Pers+Du1:m firstpersprondu ;
mijjieh+Pron+Pers+Pl1:m perspronpl ;
datne+Pron+Pers+Sg2:d nonfirstperspronsg ;
dåtnoeh+Pron+Pers+Du2:d nonfirstpersprondu ;
dijjieh+Pron+Pers+Pl2:d perspronpl ;
satne+Pron+Logo+Sg3:s nonfirstperspronsg ;
såtnoeh+Pron+Logo+Du3:s nonfirstpersprondu ;
sijjieh+Pron+Logo+Pl3:s perspronpl ;
DIHTE ; ! this is for personal pronoun use of dïhte


! Lexica for sg
! - - - - - - - 

LEXICON firstperspronsg ! First pers has special consonantism
:anne longproncase ;
+Ill:unnjien FINAL1 ;
+Ill:unnjan FINAL1 ;

LEXICON nonfirstperspronsg ! 2nd and 3rd are identical
:atne longproncase ;
+Gen:ov FINAL1 ;
+Ill:utnjien FINAL1 ;
+Ill:utnjan FINAL1 ;


! Lexica for du
! - - - - - - - 

LEXICON firstpersprondu
+Nom:ånnoeh FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:onnoej FINAL1 ;
+Gen:onnen FINAL1 ;
+Ill:onnese FINAL1 ;
:onne longproncase ;

LEXICON nonfirstpersprondu
+Nom:åtnoeh FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:otnoej FINAL1 ;
+Gen:otnen FINAL1 ;
+Ill:otnese FINAL1 ;
:otne longproncase ;



! Lexica for pl
! - - - - - - - 

LEXICON perspronpl
+Nom:ijjieh FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:ijje FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ijjem FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ijjen FINAL1 ;
+Ill:ijjese FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Use/NG:ijjide FINAL1 ; 
+Ine:ijjesne FINAL1 ;
+Ela:ijjeste FINAL1 ;
+Com:ijjeX2ine FINAL1 ;


! Common case lexica
! - - - - - - - - - 


LEXICON longproncase
+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+Acc:m FINAL1 ;
+Ine:sne FINAL1 ;
+Ela:ste FINAL1 ;
+Com:X2ine FINAL1 ;



LEXICON DIHTE
! this is a personal pronoun
! demonstrative dïhte is treated below.
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:dïhte FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:dam FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc+Use/NG:altemse FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen:dan FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:altese FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:elties FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:eltie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill:dïsse FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:altasasse FINAL1 ;!dïhte


dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine:desnie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela:destie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela+Use/NG:altasistie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com:dejnie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com+Use/NG:altasinie FINAL1 ; 

dah% guaktah+Pron+Pers+Du3+Nom:dah% guaktah FINAL1 ; ! For oahpa use

dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:dah FINAL1 ; 
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:dejtie FINAL1 ; 
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen:daj FINAL1 ; 
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen+Use/NG:dej FINAL1 ; 
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen+Use/NG:altese FINAL1 ; 
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill:dejtie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:altasissie FINAL1 ;!dïhte 
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine:dejnie FINAL1 ; 
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela:dejstie FINAL1 ; 
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com:dejgujmie FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com+Use/NG:dajgujmie FINAL1 ;

dah% guaktah+Pron+Pers+Du3+Gen:altesigan FINAL1 ; ! XXX check this


! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

! This is for:
! the attributive forms of dïhte
! all forms of the other pronouns

! The initial demonstrative lexica
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON DAGKERES
+Attr:eres # ; ! Sjekk dette paradigmet, det er bygd på m-
+Sg+Nom:eres FINAL1 ; ! Sub?
+Sg+Nom:ere FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:erem FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:eren FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:arasse FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine+Attr:arinie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine:arisnie FINAL1 ; ! sjekk ??? Ine arisnie 
+Sg+Ela:aristie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:arinie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom:erh FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:aridie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:eri FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:aridie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:arijstie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:arijnie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com:erigujmie FINAL1 ;



! Interrogative and relative pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON INTERR
+Sg+Ine:snie 		FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine+Attr:nnie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:stie        FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela+Attr:htie        FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:jnie        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:jtie        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:j           FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:jtie        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:jnie        FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:jstie       FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com:jgujmie     FINAL1 ;


! Indefinite pronouns
! -------------------

LEXICON indeven-e
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg-e ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl-e ;
+Pron+Indef: indess ;

LEXICON indeven-a
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg-a ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl-a ;
+Pron+Indef: indess ;


!kongruensContlex
LEXICON muvhtiecase
+Pron+Indef+Sg: muvhtiesg ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: muvhtiepl ;

LEXICON naakenlex
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
indodd ;


LEXICON indodd ! This lexicon cannot be removed before lexica pointing here
! get another contlex!
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg_odd ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl_odd ;
+Pron+Indef: indess_odd ;

LEXICON ind_noninfl
+Pron+Indef: FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indsg-e
+Nom:e FINAL1 ;
+Acc:e%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:e%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Attr:e%>n # ;
+Ill:e%>se FINAL1 ;
+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
+Ine+Attr:e%>ne # ;
+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
+Ela+Attr:e%>de # ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indsg-a
+Nom:a FINAL1 ;
+Acc:a%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:a%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill:e%>se FINAL1 ;
+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
+Ine+Attr:e%>ne # ;
+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;



LEXICON indpl-e
+Nom:%>h FINAL1 ;
+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:%>i FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indpl-a
+Nom:a%>h FINAL1 ;
!+Nom:a%>ah FINAL1 ; !XXX check 
+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:a%>j FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1 ;
+Com:a%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;


LEXICON indess
+Ess:%>ine FINAL1 ;


!KongruensContLex
LEXICON muvhtiesg
+Nom:ie FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ie%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ie%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Attr:ie%>n # ;
+Ine+Attr:%>ine # ;
+Ela+Attr:%>ide # ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;

LEXICON muvhtiepl
+Nom:ieh FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ie%>j FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Attr:ide # ;


LEXICON indsg_odd
+Nom:e%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;
+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1 ;
+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>asse FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+Ine:%>isnie FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>istie FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>inie FINAL1 ;




LEXICON indpl_odd
+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh FINAL1 ;
+Acc:%>idie FINAL1 ;
+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>idie FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>inie FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijstie FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indess_odd
+Ess:%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indcoll
+Pron+Coll+Pl: indpl_odd ;



! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative
magkeres+Pron+Interr:magk DAGKERES ;
dagkeres+Pron+Dem:dagk DAGKERES ;
daagkeres+Pron+Dem:daagk DAGKERES ;
doegkeres+Pron+Dem:doegk DAGKERES ;
dogkeres+Pron+Dem:dogk DAGKERES ;
LEXICON Interrogative
gie+Pron+Interr:gie INTERR ;
mij+Pron+Interr:me INTERR ;
gie+Pron+Rel:gie 				 INTERR ;
mij+Pron+Rel:me INTERR ;
LEXICON Indefinite
abpe ind_noninfl "hele" ; !probably does not have inflection, so it was removed
dovnesh:dovnes indcoll "alle" ; ! check this
eatjah:eatj indeven-a "annen, de andre" ;
eatjah:eatj indeven-e "annen, de andre" ; 
fïereguhte:fïereguht indeven-e "hver og en" ;
fïerhte:fïerht indeven-e "hver, hverthver" ;
gaajhke:gaajhk indeven-e "alle" ;
gaajhkesh:gaajhkes indcoll "alle sammen" ;
gallesh:gallas indcoll "mange sammen" ;
gellie ind_noninfl "mange" ; !also inessive for gellene e.g. gellene lehkesne - på många ställen. Example in Åarjelsaemien 6 (2000:6).
gellieh ind_noninfl ; 
gille:gill indeven-e "noen få" ;
gillesh:gilles indcoll "noen få sammen" ;
gåabpatjahkh:gåabpatjahk indeven-e "både" ;
jeatja:jeatj indeven-a "annen, de andre" ;
jeatjh:jeatj indeven-e "annen, de andre" ;
jeatjebe:jeatjab indodd "en annen, noe annet; flt. jeatjebh andre" ;
jeene:jeen indeven-e "mange, mye" ;
jeenje:jeenj indeven-e "mange, mye" ; !It's uncertain if this word can be inflected in all these cases
jeenjemes+Pron+Indef+Pl:jeenjemes indpl-e "de fleste" ;
jeenjemes+Pron+Indef:jeenjemes indess ;
jeenjesh:jeenjes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
jienebe:jienieb indodd "flere" ;
jïenesh+Use/Sub:jienes indcoll "mange sammen" ; !
jïjnjesh+Use/Sub:jijnjes indcoll "mange sammen" ; !
jïenesh:jïenes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
jïjnje:jïjnj indeven-e "mange, mye" ;
jïjnjesh:jïjnjes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
muvhte:muvht indeven-e "noen" ; 
muvhtie:muvht muvhtiecase "noen" ;
måadtesh:måadtas indcoll "mangen" ;
måedtie:måedt muvhtiecase "mange" ;
naakene:naaken naakenlex "noen, noe" ; !this most be pointed towards another lexicon due to it being three-syllabic
naakene+Use/Sub:naagen naakenlex ;
naan ind_noninfl "noen, noe" ;
seamma ind_noninfl "samme" ; !XXX
såamesh:såamas indcoll "noen, noe" ;
såamesh+Use/Sub:såames indcoll "noen, noe" ; !
såemies ind_noninfl "noen, noe" ;
åbpe ind_noninfl "hele" ; !probably does not have inflection, so it was removed
